adj/adj-comp-irr.lexc
! -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
! University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
! Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Irregular adjective comparatives
! Author: Daniel Hegglin
! Modifications: Reto Baumgartner
! Date: June 2013

Multichar_Symbols +Adj +Masc +Fem +Sg +Pl +Comp

LEXICON Root
		bun+Adj+Comp+Masc:meglier	NUMERUS;
		bun+Adj+Comp+Fem:meglra		NUMERUS;
		mal:pir						LABELS;
		nausch+Adj+Comp+Masc:mender		NUMERUS;
		nausch+Adj+Comp+Fem:menda		NUMERUS;

LEXICON LABELS
		+Adj+Comp+Masc:0			NUMERUS;
		+Adj+Comp+Fem:a				NUMERUS;

LEXICON NUMERUS
		+Sg:0						#;
		+Pl:s						#;
